test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_V_INDEP_niimi_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     niimi+VAI: niimi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+niimi+VAI: niniimi
     2+niimi+VAI: giniimi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     niimi+VAI+Neg: niimisii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl: niimimin
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl: niimimw
     niimi+VAI+3: niimiw
     niimi+VAI+X: niimim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     niimi+VAI+Dub: niimidig
     niimi+VAI+Prt: niimiban
     niimi+VAI+Prt+Dub: niimigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     niimi+VAI+3+4: niimian
     niimi+VAI+3+Pl: niimiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg: niniimisii
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg: giniimisii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl: niniimimin
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl: niniimimw
     1+niimi+VAI+3: niniimiw
     1+niimi+VAI+X: niniimim
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl: giniimimin
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl: giniimimw
     2+niimi+VAI+3: giniimiw
     2+niimi+VAI+X: giniimim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+niimi+VAI+Dub: niniimidig
     1+niimi+VAI+Prt: niniimiban
     1+niimi+VAI+Prt+Dub: niniimigoban
     2+niimi+VAI+Dub: giniimidig
     2+niimi+VAI+Prt: giniimiban
     2+niimi+VAI+Prt+Dub: giniimigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+niimi+VAI+3+4: niniimian
     1+niimi+VAI+3+Pl: niniimiag
     2+niimi+VAI+3+4: giniimian
     2+niimi+VAI+3+Pl: giniimiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: niimisiimin
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: niimisiimw
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3: niimisiiw
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X: niimisiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     niimi+VAI+Neg+Dub: niimisiidig
     niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt: niimisiiban
     niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: niimisiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+4: niimisiian
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: niimisiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: niimimindig
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: niimiminban
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: niimimingoban
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: niimimwdig
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: niimimwban
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: niimimwgoban
     niimi+VAI+3+Dub: niimiwdig
     niimi+VAI+3+Prt: niimiwban
     niimi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: niimiwgoban
     niimi+VAI+X+Dub: niimimdig
     niimi+VAI+X+Prt: niimimban
     niimi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: niimimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: niimiminan
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: niimiminag
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: niimimwan
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: niimimwag
     niimi+VAI+3+3+4: niimiwan
     niimi+VAI+3+3+Pl: niimiwag
     niimi+VAI+X+3+4: niimiman
     niimi+VAI+X+3+Pl: niimimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     niimi+VAI+Dub+3+4: niimidigan
     niimi+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: niimidigag
     niimi+VAI+Prt+3+4: niimibanan
     niimi+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: niimibanag
     niimi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: niimigobanan
     niimi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niimigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: niniimisiimin
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: niniimisiimw
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3: niniimisiiw
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X: niniimisiim
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: giniimisiimin
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: giniimisiimw
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3: giniimisiiw
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X: giniimisiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+Dub: niniimisiidig
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt: niniimisiiban
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: niniimisiigoban
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+Dub: giniimisiidig
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt: giniimisiiban
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: giniimisiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+4: niniimisiian
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: niniimisiiag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+4: giniimisiian
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: giniimisiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: niniimimindig
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: niniimiminban
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: niniimimingoban
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: niniimimwdig
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: niniimimwban
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: niniimimwgoban
     1+niimi+VAI+3+Dub: niniimiwdig
     1+niimi+VAI+3+Prt: niniimiwban
     1+niimi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: niniimiwgoban
     1+niimi+VAI+X+Dub: niniimimdig
     1+niimi+VAI+X+Prt: niniimimban
     1+niimi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: niniimimgoban
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: giniimimindig
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: giniimiminban
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: giniimimingoban
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: giniimimwdig
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: giniimimwban
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: giniimimwgoban
     2+niimi+VAI+3+Dub: giniimiwdig
     2+niimi+VAI+3+Prt: giniimiwban
     2+niimi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: giniimiwgoban
     2+niimi+VAI+X+Dub: giniimimdig
     2+niimi+VAI+X+Prt: giniimimban
     2+niimi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: giniimimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: niniimiminan
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: niniimiminag
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: niniimimwan
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: niniimimwag
     1+niimi+VAI+3+3+4: niniimiwan
     1+niimi+VAI+3+3+Pl: niniimiwag
     1+niimi+VAI+X+3+4: niniimiman
     1+niimi+VAI+X+3+Pl: niniimimag
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: giniimiminan
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: giniimiminag
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: giniimimwan
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: giniimimwag
     2+niimi+VAI+3+3+4: giniimiwan
     2+niimi+VAI+3+3+Pl: giniimiwag
     2+niimi+VAI+X+3+4: giniimiman
     2+niimi+VAI+X+3+Pl: giniimimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+niimi+VAI+Dub+3+4: niniimidigan
     1+niimi+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: niniimidigag
     1+niimi+VAI+Prt+3+4: niniimibanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: niniimibanag
     1+niimi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: niniimigobanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niniimigobanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Dub+3+4: giniimidigan
     2+niimi+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: giniimidigag
     2+niimi+VAI+Prt+3+4: giniimibanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: giniimibanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: giniimigobanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giniimigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: niimisiimindig
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: niimisiiminban
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: niimisiimingoban
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: niimisiimwdig
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: niimisiimwban
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: niimisiimwgoban
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: niimisiiwdig
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: niimisiiwban
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: niimisiiwgoban
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: niimisiimdig
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: niimisiimban
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: niimisiimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: niimisiiminan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: niimisiiminag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: niimisiimwan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: niimisiimwag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: niimisiiwan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: niimisiiwag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: niimisiiman
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: niimisiimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5
     niimi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: niimisiidigan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: niimisiidigag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: niimisiibanan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: niimisiibanag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: niimisiigobanan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niimisiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: niimimindigan
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niimimindigag
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: niimiminbanan
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niimiminbanag
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niimimingobanan
     niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niimimingobanag
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: niimimwdigan
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niimimwdigag
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: niimimwbanan
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niimimwbanag
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niimimwgobanan
     niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niimimwgobanag
     niimi+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: niimiwdigan
     niimi+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: niimiwdigag
     niimi+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: niimiwbanan
     niimi+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: niimiwbanag
     niimi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: niimiwgobanan
     niimi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niimiwgobanag
     niimi+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: niimimdigan
     niimi+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: niimimdigag
     niimi+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: niimimbanan
     niimi+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: niimimbanag
     niimi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: niimimgobanan
     niimi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niimimgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: niniimisiimindig
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: niniimisiiminban
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: niniimisiimingoban
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: niniimisiimwdig
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: niniimisiimwban
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: niniimisiimwgoban
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: niniimisiiwdig
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: niniimisiiwban
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: niniimisiiwgoban
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: niniimisiimdig
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: niniimisiimban
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: niniimisiimgoban
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: giniimisiimindig
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: giniimisiiminban
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: giniimisiimingoban
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: giniimisiimwdig
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: giniimisiimwban
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: giniimisiimwgoban
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: giniimisiiwdig
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: giniimisiiwban
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: giniimisiiwgoban
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: giniimisiimdig
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: giniimisiimban
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: giniimisiimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: niniimisiiminan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: niniimisiiminag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: niniimisiimwan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: niniimisiimwag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: niniimisiiwan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: niniimisiiwag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: niniimisiiman
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: niniimisiimag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: giniimisiiminan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: giniimisiiminag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: giniimisiimwan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: giniimisiimwag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: giniimisiiwan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: giniimisiiwag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: giniimisiiman
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: giniimisiimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: niniimisiidigan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: niniimisiidigag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: niniimisiibanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: niniimisiibanag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: niniimisiigobanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niniimisiigobanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: giniimisiidigan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: giniimisiidigag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: giniimisiibanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: giniimisiibanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: giniimisiigobanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giniimisiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: niniimimindigan
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niniimimindigag
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: niniimiminbanan
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niniimiminbanag
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niniimimingobanan
     1+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niniimimingobanag
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: niniimimwdigan
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niniimimwdigag
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: niniimimwbanan
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niniimimwbanag
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niniimimwgobanan
     1+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niniimimwgobanag
     1+niimi+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: niniimiwdigan
     1+niimi+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: niniimiwdigag
     1+niimi+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: niniimiwbanan
     1+niimi+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: niniimiwbanag
     1+niimi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: niniimiwgobanan
     1+niimi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niniimiwgobanag
     1+niimi+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: niniimimdigan
     1+niimi+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: niniimimdigag
     1+niimi+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: niniimimbanan
